District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “University of the District of Columbia Change Order No. 2 to Contract
No. GF 2021-C-0021 with Consys, Inc. Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Code 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the requirements of
section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8, 2011 (D.C. Law
18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02), the Council approves Change Order No. 2 to the
University of the District of Columbia Contract No. GF 2021-C-0021 with Consys, Inc., for the
addition of construction services to the previously approved contract CA24-0382, deemed
approved February 5, 2022 and Change Order No. 1 CA25-0675, deemed approved April 15,
2024, and authorizes payment in the not-to-exceed amount of $2,070,224.86 for the services
received and to be received pursuant to Change Order No. 2.
Sec. 3. The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as
the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of
1975, approved October 6, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code §1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto
by the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in
section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2